Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 6.2-1100.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Account”
means any account with a savings institution and includes a checking, time, interest, or savings account.

“Association”
means a savings and loan association or building and loan association that is authorized by law to accept deposits and to hold itself out to the public as engaged in the savings and loan business.

“Branch office”
means an office of a savings institution where, in addition to conducting other business activities of the institution, the institution accepts deposits.

“Federal financial institution”
means a financial institution incorporated or organized in accordance with the laws of the United States.

“Federal savings institution”
means a savings institution incorporated or organized in accordance with the laws of the United States.

“Financial institution holding company”
has the meaning assigned to it in §

6.2-700

.

“Foreign savings institution”
means a savings institution incorporated under the laws of a state other than the Commonwealth, the principal business office of which is located outside the Commonwealth. “Foreign savings institution” does not include a savings institution incorporated under the laws of the United States.

“Home loan”
means a real estate loan the security for which is a lien on real estate comprising a single-family dwelling or a dwelling unit for four or fewer families in the aggregate.

“Insured savings institution”
means a savings institution whose accounts are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or other federal insurance agency.

“Liquid assets”
means (i) cash on hand; (ii) cash on deposit in Federal Home Loan Banks, Federal Reserve Banks, savings institutions, or in commercial banks that is withdrawable upon not more than 30 days’ notice and that is not pledged as security for indebtedness; (iii) the liquid asset fund of the United States League of Saving Institutions; (iv) obligations of, or obligations that are fully guaranteed as to principal and interest by, the United States; or (v) any other asset that the Commissioner designates as a liquid asset. Any deposits in financial institutions under the control or in the possession of any supervisory authority are not liquid assets.

“Main office”
means the office where a savings institution first commences to do business or, if the savings institution has more than one office, the office designated by the institution’s board of directors as the institution’s main office.

“Manufactured building”
means a manufactured home or other structure designed for use as a dwelling or business facility that is manufactured and assembled at a location other than the site where such manufactured home or other structure is placed for use as a dwelling or business facility, or both.

“Member”
means a person (i) holding a savings account of a mutual association, (ii) borrowing from a mutual association, (iii) assuming or obligated upon a loan or interest therein held by a mutual association, or (iv) purchasing real estate securing a loan or interest therein held by a mutual association. “Member” includes such persons with a joint and survivorship or other multiple owner or borrower relationship, which persons shall constitute a single membership for purposes of this chapter.

“Mutual association”
means an association that is organized and operated exclusively for the benefit of its members and that does not issue shares of capital stock.

“Mutual savings institution”
means a savings institution that is organized and operated exclusively for the benefit of its members and that does not issue shares of capital stock.

“Real estate loan”
means:

A loan on the security of any instrument, whether a mortgage, deed of trust, or land contract, that makes the interest in real estate described therein, whether in fee or in a leasehold or subleasehold extending or renewable automatically or at the option of the holder, or at the option of the savings institution, for a period of at least 10 years beyond the maturity of the loan, specific security for the payment of the obligations secured by the instrument; or

A loan, or interest therein, secured by cooperative housing units on the security of (i) a security interest in the stock or membership certificate issued to a tenant-stockholder or resident member of a cooperative housing corporation, as defined in §

13.1-501

, coupled with (ii) the assignment by way of security of the borrower’s interest in the proprietary lease or other right of tenancy in the property owned by such corporation.“Savings account” means an interest-bearing account not subject to withdrawal by check or other negotiable instrument.“Savings bank” means a savings institution specifically chartered under the laws of the Commonwealth, another state or a territory of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the United States as a savings bank. The term savings bank does not include a savings and loan association or building and loan association.“Savings institution” means a savings and loan association, a building and loan association, or savings bank, whether organized as a capital stock corporation or a nonstock corporation, that is authorized by law to accept deposits and to hold itself out to the public as engaged in the savings institution business.“Savings institution holding company” means any person who, directly or indirectly, or acting in concert with one or more other companies or with one or more subsidiaries or affiliates, acquires, owns, controls or holds with power to vote 25 percent or more of the voting shares of a stock savings institution, or which controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of such institution.“Service corporation” means a stock corporation, all of the stock of which is owned (i) directly by one or more savings institutions or (ii) indirectly through a subsidiary or subsidiaries of one or more savings institutions.“State association” means an association incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth.“State bank” means a bank incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth and that has its principal business office in the Commonwealth.“State savings bank” means a savings bank organized and incorporated under the provisions of this chapter. A state savings bank shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter applicable only to state associations.“State savings institution” means a savings institution incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth.“Stock association” means an association that issues shares of capital stock.“Stock institution” means a savings institution that issues shares of capital stock.“Withdrawal value” means the amount credited to an account less lawful deductions therefrom, as shown by the records of the savings institution.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-201.4, 6-201.5; 1960, c. 402; 1966, c. 584, 6.1-129, 6.1-130; 1970, c. 396; 1972, c. 796, § 6.1-195.4; 1975, c. 73; 1978, c. 14; 1980, c. 350; 1982, cc. 80, 224, § 6.1-195.57:1; 1985, c. 425, §§
6.1-194.2, 6.1-194.40, 6.1-194.87; 1986, c. 500; 1988, c. 536; 1990, c. 3; 1991, cc. 228, 230, §§ 6.1-194.110, 6.1-194.131; 1996, cc. 16, 26; 1999, c. 77; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1101.
Construction and application of chapter.

It is the intention of the General Assembly that this chapter shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes set out herein.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to federal savings institutions and foreign savings institutions doing business in the Commonwealth insofar as the Commonwealth has the power to enact legislation with regard to them.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-201.3; 1960, c. 402; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-128; 1972, c. 796, § 6.1-195.3; 1985, c. 425, §§ 6.1-194.89, 6.1-194.90; 1991, c. 230, §§ 6.1-194.153, 6.1-194.154; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1102.
Associations operating share accumulation loan plans; continued operation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law with respect to the rates of interest that may be charged, an association that on September 1, 1959, was operating on a share accumulation loan plan whereby its earnings were equitably distributed to both its borrowers and its shareholders may continue to operate upon the same plan, but no additional loans shall be made or shares issued under such plan after July 1, 1974.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-201.2; 1960, c. 402; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-127; 1972, c. 796, § 6.1-195.2; 1974, c. 565; 1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.91; 1986, cc. 500, 509; 1990, c. 3; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1103.
Prohibitions on conduct of savings institution business; exceptions; penalty.

No person shall engage in the savings institution business in the Commonwealth except entities that are state associations, savings banks, federal savings institutions authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, or foreign savings institutions that have been authorized to transact a savings institution business in the Commonwealth pursuant to the provisions of Article 5 (§

6.2-1148

et seq.) of this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent any person who is not authorized to engage in the savings institution business from lending money on real estate or personal security or collateral, or from guaranteeing the payment of bonds, notes, bills or other obligations, or from purchasing or selling stocks and bonds, so long as such person does not hold himself out as being engaged in the savings institution business.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class 6 felony.

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.95; 1986, c. 509; 1992, c. 136; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 6.2-1104.
False statements and similar actions prohibited; penalty.

Any person who knowingly makes or causes to be made, directly or indirectly, or through any agency, any false statement or report, or willfully overvalues any land, property, or security, for the purpose of influencing in any way the action of any savings institution upon any application, advance, discount, purchase or repurchase agreement, commitment, or loan or any change or extension thereof, by renewal, deferment of action or otherwise, or the acceptance, release, or substitution of security therefor, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.93; 1986, c. 509; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Libel and Slander, § 49.

§ 6.2-1105.
Use of savings institution name, logo, or symbol for marketing purposes; penalty.

Except as provided in subsection B, no person shall use the name, logo, or symbol, or any combination thereof, of a savings institution, or any name, logo, or symbol, or any combination thereof, that is deceptively similar to the name, logo, or symbol of a savings institution, in marketing material provided to or solicitation of another person in a manner such that a reasonable person may believe that the marketing material or solicitation originated from or is endorsed by the savings institution or that the savings institution is responsible for the marketing material or solicitation.

This section shall not apply to (i) an affiliate or agent of the savings institution or (ii) a person who uses the name, logo, or symbol of a savings institution with the consent of the savings institution.

Any person violating the provisions of this section, either individually or as an interested party, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

This section shall not affect the availability of any remedies otherwise available to a savings institution.

History.

2005, c. 240, § 6.1-194.93:1; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

As to remedies for use of name, logo or symbol of savings institutions, see § 59.1-92.22.

§ 6.2-1106.
Prohibitions on the use of certain terms; exceptions; penalty.

No person not engaged in the business of a savings institution in the Commonwealth under the provisions of this chapter shall use any sign having thereon any assumed or corporate name containing the words “savings and loan,” “building and loan,” “savings bank,” or other words indicating that its office is the office of a savings institution; nor shall any such person use or circulate any written or printed material having thereon any assumed or corporate name or word or words indicating that the business of such person is that of a savings institution. However, the use of any of these terms in the name of any other corporation or in connection with any other business is not prohibited when additional words show clearly and definitely that the corporation is not, and that the business is not that of, a savings institution.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class 6 felony.

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.95; 1986, c. 509; 1992, c. 136; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 6.2-1107.
Defamation of savings institutions and certain federal agencies prohibited; penalty.

No person shall willfully and knowingly make, issue, circulate, or transmit, or cause or knowingly permit to be made, issued, circulated, or transmitted, any statement or rumor, written, printed, reproduced in any manner, or by word of mouth, that is untrue in fact and is (i) malicious, in that it is calculated to injure reputation or business, and (ii) derogatory to the financial condition or standing of any savings institution or Federal Home Loan Bank. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-201.52; 1960, c. 402; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-182; 1972, c. 796, § 6.1-195.62; 1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.94; 1990, c. 3; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 6.2-1108.
Membership in Federal Home Loan Bank and Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation authorized; insurance required as a condition to receiving deposits; representations that accounts are insured; misleading advertisements.

A savings institution may become a member of the Federal Home Loan Bank and the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or other federal insurance agency and conform to the provisions and regulations thereof.

Any savings institution doing business in the Commonwealth that does not have its accounts insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or other federal insurance agency, up to the limits of the insurance provided thereby, shall not accept any deposits.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-201.2, 6-201.20; 1960, c. 402; 1966, c. 584, §§ 6.1-127, 6.1-146; 1972, c. 796, §§ 6.1-195.2, 6.1-195.20; 1974, c. 565; 1985, c. 425, §§ 6.1-194.3, 6.1-194.91; 1986, cc. 500, 509; 1990, c. 3; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1109.
Representations that accounts are insured; misleading advertisements.

A savings institution shall not make any representation, oral or written, that any of its accounts are insured or guaranteed unless such accounts are insured or guaranteed by an instrumentality of the United States or other insurer approved by the Commission.

A savings institution shall not publish any misleading advertisement.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-201.53; 1960, c. 402; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-183; 1972, c. 796, § 6.1-195.63; 1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.92; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1110.
Membership in facilitating organizations or instrumentalities.

A savings institution may become a member of, deal with, maintain reserves or deposits with, or make reasonable payments or contributions to, and comply with any reasonable requirements or conditions of eligibility of, any government or private organization or instrumentality to the extent that the organization or instrumentality assists in furthering or facilitating the institution’s purposes, powers, services or community responsibilities. This section shall not be construed to permit a savings institution to establish deposit or reserve accounts with any financial institution or other entity if its accounts are not insured by federal agency or other insurer approved by the Commissioner.

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.4; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1111.
Authority to purchase, convey or manage property in which state savings institution has a security interest; time limitation.

A state savings institution may:

Purchase at any sale, public or private, any real estate or personal property upon which it has a mortgage, judgment, deed of trust, pledge, lien or other encumbrance or in which it has any interest; and

Acquire any real or personal property that is conveyed or transferred to it in full or partial satisfaction, discharge or release of loans for which such property is security.

A state savings institution may sell, convey, lease, exchange, improve, repair, mortgage, convey in trust, pledge, or encumber any real or personal property purchased or acquired by it as authorized by subsection A.

A state savings institution may invest its funds in or manage or deal in property or invest its funds in or operate a business, when any of these actions are reasonably necessary to avoid loss on a loan or investment previously made or an obligation previously created in good faith. Such property or business shall not be held or operated by the state savings institution for a period in excess of six years unless specifically authorized by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-201.15; 1960, c. 402; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-142; 1972, c. 796, § 6.1-195.16; 1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.5; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1112.
Applicability of Virginia Uniform Commercial Code to commercial paper and depository activities of savings institutions.

The definitions and provisions contained in Title 8.3A and Title 8.4 shall apply to the commercial paper and deposit account activities of savings institutions doing business in the Commonwealth, to the extent that such definitions and provisions are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1985, c. 425, § 6.1-194.7; 1992, c. 693; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1113.
Discoverability or admissibility of compliance review committee documents.

As used in this section, “compliance review committee” means a committee appointed by the board of directors of a savings institution for the purpose of evaluating and improving the savings institution’s compliance with federal and state laws and adherence to its own established ethical and financial standards, and includes any other person when that person acts in an investigatory capacity at the direction of a compliance review committee.

Any records, reports, or other documents created by a compliance review committee are confidential and shall not be discoverable or admissible in evidence in any civil action unless, upon motion, the trial court determines in its discretion that there has been an abuse of the provisions of this section.

Any records, reports, or other documents produced by a compliance review committee and delivered to a federal or state governmental agency remain confidential and shall not be discoverable or admissible in evidence in any civil action, except to the extent that applicable law provides that such records, reports or other documents are not protected from disclosure.

In no event shall the existence of or any action by a compliance review committee serve as a basis or justification for delay of, or limit upon, the discovery process set forth in state or federal rules.

The work product created by any person acting in an investigatory capacity at the direction of a compliance review committee prior to his participation in the work of the compliance review committee or at the direction of the compliance review committee shall be subject to the rules governing discovery in accordance with the Rules of the Virginia Supreme Court.

This section shall not be construed to limit the discovery or admissibility:

In any civil action of any records, reports, or other documents that are not created by a compliance review committee; or

Of any factual information which may be reviewed by a compliance review committee.

History.

1994, c. 201, §§ 6.1-2.16, 6.1-2.17, 6.1-2.18; 2010, c. 794.